North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 1. Classification of Militia.

§ 127A-1.
Composition of militia.

The militia of the State shall consist of all able-bodied citizens of the State and of the United States and all other able-bodied persons who have or shall declare their intention to become citizens of the United States, subject to the qualifications prescribed in this Chapter, who shall be drafted into the militia or shall voluntarily accept commission, appointment, or assignment to duty therein.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 1; C.S., s. 6791; 1949, c. 1130, s. 1; 1957, c. 1043, s. 1; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1967, c. 563, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “prescribed in this Chapter” for “as may be hereinafter prescribed” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-2.
Classification of militia.

The militia shall be divided into the organized and unorganized militia. The organized militia shall consist of four classes: the North Carolina National Guard, the naval militia, the State defense militia and historic military commands.

History.

1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the second sentence.

§ 127A-3.
Organized militia; National Guard.

The North Carolina National Guard, both Army and Air, shall consist of regularly commissioned, warrant and enlisted personnel within the age limits established by regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service and shall be organized, governed, armed, equipped and have the duties and responsibilities provided in this Chapter.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 2; C.S., s. 6792; 1949, c. 1130, s. 1; 1957, c. 136, s. 1; 1961, c. 192, s. 1; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” near the beginning.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Army and Air” for “army and air,” “within the age limits established” for “between such ages as may be established” and “provided in this Chapter” for “as hereinafter provided,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-4.
Organized militia; naval militia.

The naval militia shall consist of regularly commissioned, warrant and enlisted personnel within the age limits established by regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate service and shall be organized, governed, armed, equipped and have the duties and responsibilities provided in this Chapter.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 3; C.S., s. 6793; 1949, c. 1130, s. 1; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “within the age limits established” for “between such ages as may be established” and “provided in this Chapter” for “as hereinafter provided,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-5.
Organized militia; State defense militia.

The State defense militia shall consist of commissioned, warrant and enlisted personnel called, ordered, appointed or enlisted therein by the Governor under the provisions of Article 5 of this Chapter and shall be organized, governed, armed, equipped and have the duties and responsibilities provided in this Chapter.

History.

1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “provided in this Chapter” for “as hereinafter provided” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 127A-6.
Organized militia; historic military commands.

Historic military commands are those historic groups which remain active by meeting at least once a month and which follow military procedures. Only groups designated by the Governor shall fall within this branch of the militia. Any maximum age limits prescribed by this Chapter do not apply to members of historic military commands.

History.

1957, c. 1043, s. 2; 1967, c. 563, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “Only groups designated” for “Only such groups as may be designated” and “do not apply” for “shall not be applicable.”

§ 127A-7.
Composition of unorganized militia.

The unorganized militia shall consist of all other able-bodied citizens of the State and of the United States and all other able-bodied persons who have or shall declare their intention to become citizens of the United States, who shall be at least 17 years of age, except those who have been convicted of a felony or discharged from any component of the military under other than honorable conditions.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 4; C.S., s. 6794; 1949, c. 1130, s. 1; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 314, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “all other able-bodied persons” for “such other able-bodied persons.”

§ 127A-8.
Exemptions from duty with the militia.

The officers, judicial and executive, of the government of the United States and the State of North Carolina, persons in the military or naval service of the United States, customhouse clerks, persons employed by the United States in the transmission of mail, artificers and personnel employed in the armories, arsenals and navy yards of the United States, pilots, and mariners actually employed in the sea service of any citizen or merchant within the United States shall be exempt from duty with the militia without regard to age, and all persons who, because of religious beliefs, claim exemption from duty with the militia, if the conscientious holding of the belief by that person is established under the regulations prescribed for exemption from service with the Armed Forces of the United States, shall be exempted from militia service in a combatant capacity; but no person so exempted shall be exempt from militia service in any capacity that shall be declared noncombatant for the Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 5; C.S., s. 6795; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, deleted “as are or may be” preceding “prescribed for exemption” and twice substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-9.
Number of troops authorized.

In time of peace the State shall maintain only those troops that are authorized by the President of the United States; but nothing contained in this Chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of the State in the use of the North Carolina National Guard or the State defense militia or both within its borders in time of peace. Nothing contained in this Chapter shall prevent the organization and maintenance of State police or constabulary.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 8; C.S., s. 6797; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-10.
Corps entitled to retain privileges.

Any corps of artillery, cavalry, or infantry existing in the State on the passage of the act of Congress of May 8, 1792, which by the laws, customs, or usages of the State has been in continuous existence since the passage of that act, under its provisions and under the provisions of section 232 and sections 1625 to 1660, both inclusive, of Title 16 of the revised statutes of 1873 and the act of Congress of January 21, 1903, relating to the militia, shall be allowed to retain its ancient privileges, subject, nevertheless, to all duties required by law of the militia; but these organizations may be a part of the North Carolina National Guard, and entitled to all the privileges of this Chapter, and shall conform in all respects to the organization, discipline, and training of the North Carolina National Guard in time of war. For purposes of training and when on active duty in the service of the United States they may be assigned to higher units, as the President may direct, and shall be subject to the orders of officers under whom they shall be serving.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 87; C.S., s. 6798; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” twice in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice inserted “North Carolina” and made minor stylistic changes.

§§ 127A-11 through 127A-15.

Reserved for future codification purposes.